Utah statutes.
19-3-201.   Interstate Compact on Low-level Radioactive Waste -- Policy and purpose of compact.

The party states recognize that low-level radioactive wastes are generated by essential activities and services that benefit the citizens of the states. It is further recognized that the protection of the health and safety of the citizens of the party states and the most economical management of low-level radioactive wastes can be accomplished through cooperation of the states in minimizing the amount of handling and transportation required to dispose of the wastes and through the cooperation of the states in providing facilities that serve the region.  It is the policy of the party states to undertake the necessary cooperation to protect the health and safety of the citizens of the party states and to provide for the most economical management of low-level radioactive wastes on a continuing basis.  It is the purpose of this compact to provide the means for a cooperative effort among the party states so that the protection of the citizens of the states and the maintenance of the viability of the states' economies will be enhanced while sharing the responsibilities of radioactive low-level waste management.

